trunk/incubator/apertium-ga-gd.gd.dix
    <pardef n="initial-S">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>S</l>
          <r>S</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Sh</l>
          <r>S</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>S</l>
          <r>S</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-T">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>T</l>
          <r>T</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Th</l>
          <r>T</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>T</l>
          <r>T</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Determiners -->

    <pardef n="an__det">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="ca/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/ear__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="seòm/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raichean</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raichean</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raichean</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="caile/ag__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agan</l>
          <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agan</l>
          <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agan</l>
          <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="agus__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gun__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="an"><i/><par n="an__det"/></e>
    <e lm="agus"><i>agus</i><par n="agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="gun"><i>gun</i><par n="gun__cnjsub"/></e>
